Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1085.
do enact as follows:SB1085,14Section 1. 20.255 (3) (bt) of the statutes is created to read:SB1085,2,2120.255 (3) (bt) Teacher longevity bonuses. A sum sufficient to make the 2payments under s. 115.418.SB1085,23Section 2. 40.02 (22) (b) 15. of the statutes is created to read:SB1085,2,5440.02 (22) (b) 15. A bonus payment made by the department of public 5instruction under s. 115.418.SB1085,36Section 3. 115.418 of the statutes is created to read:SB1085,2,107115.418 Teacher longevity bonuses. (1) Subject to sub. (2), beginning in 8the 2031-32 school year, from the appropriation under s. 20.255 (3) (bt), the 9department shall pay a bonus in the amount of $7,000 to each individual who 10satisfies all of the following:SB1085,2,1211(a) The individual is licensed as a teacher by the state superintendent and has 12been continuously so licensed for the previous 5 school years.SB1085,2,1413(b) The individual is employed as a teacher by a school board and has been 14continuously so employed by that school board for the previous 5 school years.SB1085,2,1815(2) If an individual receives a bonus payment under sub. (1), the individual is 16eligible for an additional bonus payment for each subsequent 5-year period that 17does not include a school year that was used to determine the individual’s eligibility 18for a prior bonus payment under sub. (1).SB1085,2,2119(3) Beginning in the 2031-32 school year, each school board shall annually 20report to the department the names of teachers employed by the school board who 21are eligible for a bonus payment under sub. (1).SB1085,422Section 4. 119.04 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1085,3,1323119.04 (1) Subchapters IV, V and VII of ch. 115, ch. 121 and ss. 66.0235 (3) (c), 166.0603 (1m) to (3), 115.01 (1) and (2), 115.28, 115.31, 115.33, 115.34, 115.343, 2115.345, 115.363, 115.364, 115.365 (3), 115.366, 115.367, 115.38 (2), 115.415, 3115.418, 115.445, 118.001 to 118.04, 118.045, 118.06, 118.07, 118.075, 118.076, 4118.10, 118.12, 118.124, 118.125 to 118.14, 118.145 (4), 118.15, 118.153, 118.16, 5118.162, 118.163, 118.164, 118.18, 118.19, 118.196, 118.20, 118.223, 118.225, 6118.24 (1), (2) (c) to (f), (6), (8), and (10), 118.245, 118.25, 118.255, 118.258, 118.291, 7118.292, 118.293, 118.2935, 118.30 to 118.43, 118.46, 118.50, 118.51, 118.52, 8118.53, 118.55, 118.56, 118.58, 120.12 (2m), (4m), (5), and (15) to (27), 120.125, 9120.13 (1), (2) (b) to (g), (3), (14), (17) to (19), (26), (34), (35), (37), (37m), and (38), 10120.137, 120.14, 120.20, 120.21 (3), and 120.25 are applicable to a 1st class city 11school district and board but not, unless explicitly provided in this chapter or in the 12terms of a contract, to the commissioner or to any school transferred to an 13opportunity schools and partnership program.SB1085,3,1414